tr: İşlemci Soketi: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Diğer
nb: Prosessorinngang: LGA 1150 (sokkel H3); LGA 1151 (sokkel H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (sokkel H2); LGA 1156 (sokkel H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (sokkel B); LGA 2011 (sokkel R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (sokkel R4); LGA 3647 (sokkel P); LGA 775 (sokkel T); Sokkel 370; Sokkel 423; Sokkel 478; Sokkel 479; Sokkel 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Sokkel 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Sokkel 939; Sokkel 940; Sokkel 988; Sokkel A (462); Sokkel AM1; Sokkel AM2; Sokkel AM2+; Sokkel AM3; Sokkel AM3+; Sokkel AM4; Sokkel C32; Sokkel F (1207); Sokkel FM1; Sokkel FM2; Sokkel FM2+; Socket FP2; Sokkel FP3; Sokkel FP4; Sokkel FP5; Sokkel G2; Sokkel G3; Sokkel G34; Sokkel M (mPGA478MT); Sokkel P; Sokkel S1; Sokkel SP3; Sokkel TR4; Sokkel TRX4; Sokkel sTRX4; Sokkel sWRX8; Annen
ko: 프로세서 소켓: LGA 1150(소켓 H3); LGA 1151(소켓 H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155(소켓 H2); LGA 1156(소켓 H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366(소켓 B); LGA 2011(소켓 R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066(소켓 R4); LGA 3647(소켓 P); LGA 775(소켓 T); 소켓 370; 소켓 423; 소켓 478; 소켓 479; 소켓 603; 소켓 604(mPGA604); 소켓 754; 소켓 771(소켓 J); 소켓 939; 소켓 940; 소켓 988; 소켓 A(462); 소켓 AM1; 소켓 AM2; 소켓 AM2+; 소켓 AM3; 소켓 AM3+; 소켓 AM4; 소켓 C32; 소켓 F(1207); 소켓 FM1; 소켓 FM2; 소켓 FM2+; 소켓 FP2; 소켓 FP3; 소켓 FP4; 소켓 FP5; 소켓 G2; 소켓 G3; 소켓 G34; 소켓 M(mPGA478MT); 소켓 P; 소켓 S1; 소켓 SP3; 소켓 TR4; 소켓 TRX4; 소켓 sTRX4; 소켓 sWRX8; 기타
hr-HR: Procesorska utičnica: LGA 1150 (utičnica H3); LGA 1151 (utičnica H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (utičnica H2); LGA 1156 (utičnica H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (utičnica B); LGA 2011 (utičnica R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (utičnica R4); LGA 3647 (utičnica P); LGA 775 (utičnica T); Utičnica 370; Utičnica 423; Utičnica 478; Utičnica 479; Utičnica 603; Utičnica 604 (mPGA604); Utičnica 754; Utičnica 771 (utičnica J); Utičnica 939; Utičnica 940; Utičnica 988; Utičnica A (462); Utičnica AM1; Utičnica AM2; Utičnica AM2+; Utičnica AM3; Utičnica AM3+; Utičnica AM4; Utičnica C32; Utičnica F (1207); Utičnica FM1; Utičnica FM2; Utičnica FM2+; Utičnica FP2; Utičnica FP3; Utičnica FP4; Utičnica FP5; Utičnica G2; Utičnica G3; Utičnica G34; Utičnica M (mPGA478MT); Utičnica P; Utičnica S1; Utičnica SP3; Utičnica TR4; Utičnica TRX4; Utičnica sTRX4; Utičnica sWRX8; Ostalo
zh-TW: 處理器插座: LGA 1150 (H3 插槽); LGA 1151 (H4 插槽); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (H2 插槽); LGA 1156 (H 插槽); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (B 插槽); LGA 2011 (R 插槽); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (R4 插槽); LGA 3647 (P 插槽); LGA 775 (T 插槽); 370 插槽; 423 插槽; 478 插槽; 479 插槽; 603 插槽; 插槽 604 (mPGA604); 754 插槽; Socket 771 (J 插槽); 939 插槽; 940 插槽; 988 插槽; 插槽 A (462); 插槽 AM1; 插槽 AM2; 插槽 AM2+; 插槽 AM3; 插槽 AM3+; 插槽 AM4; 插槽 C32; 插槽 F (1207); 插槽 FM1; 插槽 FM2; 插槽 FM2+; 插槽 FP2; 插槽 FP3; 插槽 FP4; 插槽 FP5; 插槽 G2; 插槽 G3; 插槽 G34; 插槽 M (mPGA478MT); 插槽 P; 插槽 S1; 插槽 SP3; 插槽 TR4; 插槽 TRX4; 插槽 sTRX4; 插槽 sWRX8; 其他
nl: Processoraansluiting: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Andere
zh-CN: 处理器插槽: LGA 1150（插槽 H3）; LGA 1151（插槽 H4）; LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155（插槽 H2）; LGA 1156（插槽 H）; LGA 1200; LGA 1366（插槽 B）; LGA 2011（插槽 R）; LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066（插槽 R4）; LGA 3647（插槽 P）; LGA 775（插槽 T）; 插槽 370; 插槽 423; 插槽 478; 插槽 479; 插槽 603; 插槽 604 (mPGA604); 插槽 754; 插座 771（插座 J）; 插槽 939; 插槽 940; 插槽 988; 插槽 A (462); 插槽 AM1; 插槽 AM2; 插槽 AM2+; 插槽 AM3; 插槽 AM3+; 插槽 AM4; 插槽 C32; 插槽 F (1207); 插槽 FM1; 插槽 FM2; 插槽 FM2+; 插座 FP2; 插槽 FP3; 插槽 FP4; 插槽 FP5; 插槽 G2; 插槽 G3; 插槽 G34; 插槽 M (mPGA478MT); 插槽 P; 插槽 S1; 插槽 SP3; 插槽 TR4; 插槽 TRX4; 插槽 sTRX4; 插槽 sWRX8; 其他
cs: Patice (socket) procesoru: LGA 1150 (patice H3); LGA 1151 (patice H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (patice H2); LGA 1156 (patice H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (patice B); LGA 2011 (patice R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (patice R4); LGA 3647 (patice P); LGA 775 (patice T); Patice 370; Patice 423; Patice 478; Patice 479; Patice 603; Patice 604 (mPGA604); Patice 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Patice 939; Patice 940; Patice 988; Patice A (462); Patice AM1; Patice AM2; Patice AM2+; Patice AM3; Patice AM3+; Patice AM4; Patice C32; Patice F (1207); Patice FM1; Patice FM2; Patice FM2+; Socket FP2; Patice FP3; Patice FP4; Patice FP5; Patice G2; Patice G3; Patice G34; Patice M (mPGA478MT); Patice P; Patice S1; Patice SP3; Patice TR4; Patice TRX4; Patice sTRX4; Patice sWRX8; Jiné
fi: Suorittimen liitäntä: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Pistoke 771 (pistoke J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Pistoke FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Muu
da: Processorstik: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Sokkel 771 (sokkel J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Sokkel FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Andet
pt-BR: Soquete do processador: LGA 1150 (Soquete H3); LGA 1151 (Soquete H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (Soquete H2); LGA 1156 (Soquete H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (Soquete B); LGA 2011 (Soquete R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Soquete R4); LGA 3647 (Soquete P); LGA 775 (Soquete T); Soquete 370; Soquete 423; Soquete 478; Soquete 479; Soquete 603; Soquete 604 (mPGA604); Soquete 754; Soquete 771 (soquete J); Soquete 939; Soquete 940; Soquete 988; Soquete A (462); Soquete AM1; Soquete AM2; Soquete AM2+; Soquete AM3; Soquete AM3+; Soquete AM4; Soquete C32; Soquete F (1207); Soquete FM1; Soquete FM2; Soquete FM2+; Soquete FP2; Soquete FP3; Soquete FP4; Soquete FP5; Soquete G2; Soquete G3; Soquete G34; Soquete M (mPGA478MT); Soquete P; Soquete S1; Soquete SP3; Soquete TR4; Soquete TRX4; Soquete sTRX4; Soquete sWRX8; Outro
ro-RO: Soclu procesor: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H3); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Altele
el: Υποδοχή επεξεργαστή: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Υποδοχή 370; Υποδοχή 423; Υποδοχή 478; Υποδοχή 479; Υποδοχή 603; Υποδοχή 604 (mPGA604); Υποδοχή 754; Υποδοχή 771 (υποδοχή J); Υποδοχή 939; Υποδοχή 940; Υποδοχή 988; Υποδοχή A (462); Υποδοχή AM1; Υποδοχή AM2; Υποδοχή AM2+; Υποδοχή AM3; Υποδοχή AM3+; Υποδοχή AM4; Υποδοχή C32; Υποδοχή F (1207); Υποδοχή FM1; Υποδοχή FM2; Socket FM2+; Υποδοχή FP2; Υποδοχή FP3; Υποδοχή FP4; Υποδοχή FP5; Υποδοχή G2; Υποδοχή G3; Υποδοχή G34; Υποδοχή M (mPGA478MT); Υποδοχή P; Υποδοχή S1; Υποδοχή SP3; Υποδοχή TR4; Υποδοχή TRX4; Υποδοχή sTRX4; Υποδοχή sWRX8; Άλλο
it: Presa del processore: LGA 1150 (presa H3); LGA 1151 (presa H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (presa H2); LGA 1156 (presa H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (presa B2); LGA 2011 (presa R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (presa R4); LGA 3647 (presa P); LGA 775 (presa T); Presa 370; Presa 423; Presa 478; Presa 479; Presa 603; Presa 604 (mPGA604); Presa 754; Presa 771 (presa J); Presa 939; Presa 940; Presa 988; Presa A (462); Presa AM1; Presa AM2; Presa AM2+; Presa AM3; Presa AM3+; Presa AM4; Presa C32; Presa F (1207); Presa FM1; Presa FM2; Presa FM2+; Presa FP2; Presa FP3; Presa FP4; Presa FP5; Presa G2; Presa G3; Presa G34; Presa M (mPGA478MT); Presa P; Presa S1; Presa SP3; Presa TR4; Presa TRX4; Presa sTRX4; Presa sWRX8; Altro
es: Zócalo del procesador: BGA 1150 (enchufe H3); LGA 1151 (enchufe H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (enchufe H2); LGA 1156 (enchufe H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (enchufe B); LGA 2011 (enchufe R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Enchufe R4); LGA 3647 (enchufe P); LGA 775 (enchufe T); Enchufe 370; Enchufe 423; Enchufe 478; Enchufe 479; Enchufe 603; Enchufe 604 (mPGA604); Enchufe 754; Enchufe 771 (enchufe J); Enchufe 939; Enchufe 940; Enchufe 988; Enchufe A (462); Enchufe AM1; Enchufe AM2; Enchufe AM2+; Enchufe AM3; Enchufe AM3+; Enchufe AM4; Enchufe C32; Enchufe F (1207); Enchufe FM1; Enchufe FM2; Enchufe FM2+; Enchufe FP2; Enchufe FP3; Enchufe FP4; Enchufe FP5; Enchufe G2; Enchufe G3; Enchufe G34; Enchufe M (mPGA478MT); Enchufe P; Enchufe S1; Enchufe SP3; Enchufe TR4; Enchufe TRX4; Enchufe sTRX4; Enchufe sWRX8; Otros
en: Processor socket: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Other
th: ซ็อกเก็ตผู้ประมวลผล: LGA 1150 (Socket H3); LGA 1151 (Socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (Socket H2); LGA 1156 (Socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (Socket B); LGA 2011 (Socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (Socket P); LGA 775 (Socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (Socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Zásuvka procesora: LGA 1150 (zásuvka H3); LGA 1151 (zásuvka H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (zásuvka H2); LGA 1156 (zásuvka H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (zásuvka B); LGA 2011 (zásuvka R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (zásuvka R4); LGA 3647 (zásuvka P); LGA 775 (zásuvka T); Zásuvka 370; Zásuvka 423; Zásuvka 478; Zásuvka 479; Zásuvka 603; Zásuvka 604 (mPGA604); Zásuvka 754; Zásuvka 771 (zásuvka J); Zásuvka 939; Zásuvka 940; Zásuvka 988; Zásuvka A (462); Zásuvka AM1; Zásuvka AM2; Zásuvka AM2+; Zásuvka AM3; Zásuvka AM3+; Zásuvka AM4; Zásuvka C32; Zásuvka F (1207); Zásuvka FM1; Zásuvka FM2; Zásuvka FM2+; Zásuvka FP2; Zásuvka FP3; Zásuvka FP4; Zásuvka FP5; Zásuvka G2; Zásuvka G3; Zásuvka G34; Zásuvka M (mPGA478MT); Zásuvka P; Zásuvka S1; Zásuvka SP3; Zásuvka TR4; Zásuvka TRX4; Zásuvka sTRX4; Zásuvka SWRX8; Iné
fr: Prise du processeur: LGA 1150 (prise H3); LGA 1151 (prise H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (prise H2); LGA 1156 (prise H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (prise B); LGA 2011 (prise R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (prise R4); LGA 3647 (prise P); LGA 775 (prise T); Prise 370; Prise 423; Prise 478; Prise 479; Prise 603; Prise 604 (mPGA604); Prise 754; Prise 771 (prise J); Prise 939; Prise 940; Prise 988; Prise A (462); Prise AM1; Prise AM2; Prise AM2+; Prise AM3; Prise AM3+; Prise AM4; Prise C32; Prise F (1207); Prise FM1; Prise FM2; Prise FM2+; Prise FP2; Prise FP3; Prise FP4; Prise FP5; Prise G2; Prise G3; Prise G34; Prise M (mPGA478MT); Prise F; Prise S1; Prise SP3; Prise TR4; Prise TRX4; Prise sTRX4; Prise sWRX8; Autre
vi: Ổ cắm bộ xử lý: LGA 1150 (ổ cắm H3); LGA 1151 (ổ cắm H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (ổ cắm H2); LGA 1156 (ổ cắm H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (ổ cắm B); LGA 2011 (ổ cắm R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (ổ cắm R4); LGA 3647 (ổ cắm P); LGA 775 (ổ cắm T); Ổ cắm 370; Ổ cắm 423; Ổ cắm 478; Ổ cắm 479; Ổ cắm 603; Ổ cắm 604 (mPGA604); Ổ cắm 754; Ổ cắm 771 (ổ cắm J); Ổ cắm 939; Ổ cắm 940; Ổ cắm 988; Ổ cắm A (462); Ổ cắm AM1; Ổ cắm AM2; Ổ cắm AM2+; Ổ cắm AM3; Ổ cắm AM3+; Ổ cắm AM4; Ổ cắm C32; Ổ cắm F (1207); Ổ cắm FM1; Ổ cắm FM2; Ổ cắm FM2+; Ổ cắm FP2; Ổ cắm FP3; Ổ cắm FP4; Ổ cắm FP5; Ổ cắm G2; Ổ cắm G3; Ổ cắm G34; Ổ cắm M (mPGA478MT); Ổ cắm P; Ổ cắm S1; Ổ cắm SP3; Ổ cắm TR4; Ổ cắm TRX4; Ổ cắm sTRX4; Ổ cắm sWRX8; Khác
hu: Processzorfoglalat: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vtičnica procesorja: LGA 1150 (vtičnica H3); LGA 1151 (vtičnica H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (vtičnica H2); LGA 1156 (vtičnica H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (vtičnica B); LGA 2011 (vtičnica R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (vtičnica R4); LGA 3647 (vtičnica P); LGA 775 (vtičnica T); Vtičnica 370; Vtičnica 423; Vtičnica 478; Vtičnica 479; Vtičnica 603; Vtičnica 604 (mPGA604); Vtičnica 754; Vtičnica 771 (vtičnica J); Vtičnica 939; Vtičnica 940; Vtičnica 988; Vtičnica A (462); Vtičnica AM1; Vtičnica AM2; Vtičnica AM2+; Vtičnica AM3+; Vtičnica AM3+; Vtičnica AM4+; Vtičnica C32; Vtičnica F (1207); Vtičnica FM1; Vtičnica FM2; Vtičnica FM2+; Vtičnica FP2; Vtičnica FP3; Vtičnica FP4; Vtičnica FP5; Vtičnica G2; Vtičnica G3; Vtičnica G34; Vtičnica M (mPGA478MT); Vtičnica P; Vtičnica S1; Vtičnica SP3; Vtičnica TR4; Vtičnica TRX4; Vtičnica sTRX4; Vtičnica sWRX8; Drugo
pl: Gniazdo procesora: LGA 1150 (gniazdo H3); LGA 1151 (gniazdo H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (gniazdo H2); LGA 1156 (gniazdo H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (gniazdo B); LGA 2011 (gniazdo R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (gniazdo R4); LGA 3647 (gniazdo P); LGA 775 (gniazdo T); Gniazdo 370; Gniazdo 423; Gniazdo 478; Gniazdo 479; Gniazdo 603; Gniazdo 604 (mPGA604); Gniazdo 754; Gniazdo 771 (gniazdo J); Gniazdo 939; Gniazdo 940; Gniazdo 988; Gniazdo A (462); Gniazdo AM1; Gniazdo AM2; Gniazdo AM2+; Gniazdo AM3; Gniazdo AM3+; Gniazdo AM4; Gniazdo C32; Gniazdo F (1207); Gniazdo FM1; Gniazdo FM2; Gniazdo FM2+; Gniazdo FP2; Gniazdo FP3; Gniazdo FP4; Gniazdo FP5; Gniazdo G2; Gniazdo G3; Gniazdo G34; Gniazdo M (mPGA478MT); Gniazdo P; Gniazdo S1; Gniazdo SP3; Gniazdo TR4; Gniazdo TRX4; Gniazdo sTRX4; Gniazdo sWRX8; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Procesoriaus lizdas: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Lizdas AM2; Lizdas AM2+; Lizdas AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Kita
ru: Сокет для процессора: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (socket T); Socket 370; Socket 423; Socket 478; Socket 479; Socket 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Socket 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Socket 939; Socket 940; Socket 988; Socket A (462); Socket AM1; Socket AM2; Socket AM2+; Socket AM3; Socket AM3+; Socket AM4; Socket C32; Socket F (1207); Socket FM1; Socket FM2; Socket FM2+; Socket FP2; Socket FP3; Socket FP4; Socket FP5; Socket G2; Socket G3; Socket G34; Socket M (mPGA478MT); Socket P; Socket S1; Socket SP3; Socket TR4; Socket TRX4; Socket sTRX4; Socket sWRX8; Другой
sv: Processoruttag: BGA 1150 (uttag H3); BGA 1151 (uttag H4); LGA 1151 v2; BGA 1155 (uttag H2); BGA 1156 (uttag H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (uttag B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Socket R4); LGA 3647 (socket P); LGA 775 (uttag T); Uttag 370; Uttag 423; Uttag 478; Uttag 479; Uttag 603; Socket 604 (mPGA604); Uttag 754; Socket 771 (socket J); Uttag 939; Uttag 940; Uttag 988; Uttag A (462); Uttag AM1; Uttag AM2; Uttag AM2+; Uttag AM3; Uttag AM3+; Uttag AM4; Uttag C32; Uttag F (1207); Uttag FM1; Uttag FM2; Uttag FM2+; Socket FP2; Uttag FP3; Uttag FP4; Uttag FP5; Uttag G2; Uttag G3; Uttag G34; Uttag M (mPGA478MT); Uttag P; Uttag S1; Uttag SP3; Uttag TR4; Uttag TRX4; Uttag sTRX4; Uttag sWRX8; Annat
pt-PT: Tomada do processador: LGA 1150 (tomada H3); LGA 1151 (tomada H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (tomada H2); LGA 1156 (tomada H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (tomada B); LGA 2011 (tomada R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (tomada R4); LGA 3647 (tomada P); LGA 775 (tomada T); Tomada 370; Tomada 423; Tomada 478; Tomada 479; Tomada 603; Tomada 604 (mPGA604); Tomada 754; Tomada 771 (tomada J); Tomada 939; Tomada 940; Tomada 988; Tomada A (462); Tomada AM1; Tomada AM2; Tomada AM2+; Tomada AM3; Tomada AM3+; Tomada AM4; Tomada C32; Tomada F (1207); Tomada FM1; Tomada FM2; Tomada FM2+; Tomada FP2; Tomada FP3; Tomada FP4; Tomada FP5; Tomada G2; Tomada G3; Tomada G34; Tomada M (mPGA478MT); Tomada P; Tomada S1; Tomada SP3; Tomada TR4; Tomada TRX4; Tomada sTRX4; Tomada sWRX8; Outro
ja: プロセッサソケット: LGA 1150 (socket H3); LGA 1151 (socket H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (socket H2); LGA 1156 (socket H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (socket B); LGA 2011 (socket R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (ソケットR4); LGA 3647 (ソケットP); LGA 775 (ソケットT); ソケット 370; ソケット 423; ソケット 478; ソケット 479; ソケット 603; ソケット 604 (mPGA604); ソケット 611; Socket 771 (ソケットJ); ソケット 939; ソケット 940; ソケット 988; ソケット A (462); ソケット AM1; ソケット AM2; ソケット AM2+; ソケット AM3; ソケット AM3+; ソケット AM4; ソケット C32; ソケット F (1207); ソケット FM1; ソケット FM2; ソケット FM2+; Socket FP2; ソケット FP3; ソケット FP4; ソケット FP5; ソケット G2; ソケット G3; ソケット G34; ソケット M (mPGA478MT); ソケット P; ソケット S1; ソケット SP3; ソケット TR4; ソケット TRX4; ソケット sTRX4; ソケット sWRX8; その他
bg-BG: Гнездо за процесор: LGA 1150 (гнездо H3); LGA 1151 (гнездо H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (гнездо H2); LGA 1156 (гнездо H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (гнездо B); LGA 2011 (гнездо R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (гнездо R4); LGA 3647 (гнездо P); LGA 775 (гнездо T); Гнездо 370; Гнездо 423; Гнездо 478; Гнездо 479; Гнездо 603; Гнездо 604 (mPGA604); Гнездо 754; Гнездо 771 (гнездо J); Гнездо 939; Гнездо 940; Гнездо 988; Гнездо A (462); Гнездо AM1; Гнездо AM2; Гнездо AM2+; Гнездо AM3; Гнездо AM3+; Гнездо AM4; Гнездо C32; Гнездо F (1207); Гнездо FM1; Гнездо FM2; Гнездо FM2+; Гнездо FP2; Гнездо FP3; Гнездо FP4; Гнездо FP5; Гнездо G2; Гнездо G3; Цокъл G34; Гнездо M (mPGA478MT); Гнездо P; Гнездо S1; Гнездо SP3; Гнездо TR4; Гнездо TRX4; Гнездо sTRX4; Гнездо sWRX8; Други
de: Prozessorsockel: LGA 1150 (Sockel H3); LGA 1151 (Sockel H4); LGA 1151 v2; LGA 1155 (Sockel H2); LGA 1156 (Sockel H); LGA 1200; LGA 1366 (Sockel B); LGA 2011 (Sockel R); LGA 2011-v3; LGA 2066 (Sockel R4); LGA 3647 (Sockel P); LGA 775 (Sockel T); Sockel 370; Sockel 423; Sockel 478; Sockel 479; Sockel 603; Sockel 604 (mPGA604); Sockel 754; Sockel 771 (Sockel J); Sockel 939; Sockel 940; Sockel 988; Sockel A (462); Sockel AM1; Sockel AM2; Sockel AM2+; Sockel AM3; Sockel AM3+; Sockel AM4; Sockel C32; Sockel F (1207); Sockel FM1; Sockel FM2; Sockel FM2+; Sockel FP2; Sockel FP3; Sockel FP4; Sockel FP5; Sockel G2; Sockel G3; Sockel G34; Sockel M (mPGA478MT); Sockel P; Sockel S1; Sockel SP3; Sockel TR4; Sockel TRX4; Sockel sTRX4; Sockel sWRX8; Sonstiges